Hawaii statutes.
§490:11-103 Transition to new
U.C.C.--General Rule. Transactions validly entered into after January 1,
1967 and before July 1, 1979, and which were subject to the provisions of old
U.C.C. and which would be subject to this Act as amended if they had been
entered into after the effective date of July 1, 1979 and the rights, duties
and interests flowing from such transactions remain valid after the latter date
and may be terminated, completed, consummated or enforced as required or
permitted by the new U.C.C. Security interests arising out of such
transactions which are perfected when the new U.C.C. becomes effective shall
remain perfected until they lapse as provided in the new U.C.C., and may be
continued as permitted by new U.C.C., except as stated in section 490:11-105.
[L 1978, c 155, pt of §1(34)]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next